Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 7 Retirement of Employees of Schools and Educational Institutions
Subchapter 3
— Arkansas Teacher Retirement System — Board of Trustees

Effective Dates.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 11, as added by Acts 1973, No. 878, § 1: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the provisions of this Act would substantially revise the provisions and benefits provided in the Teacher Retirement System law; that it is essential that such revision be given effect on July 1, 1973 in order that the effective date of the Act will coincide with the beginning of a new fiscal year; that under the Constitution of Arkansas, Acts without an emergency clause do not take effect until ninety days after adjournment of the General Assembly and that unless an emergency is declared, extension of the regular session of the General Assembly will result in a delay in the effectiveness of this Act beyond July 1 and would work irreparable harm upon the teachers of this State. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1973, No. 878, § 2: Apr. 16, 1973. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 427 of 1973 relating to and making substantial revisions in the Teacher Retirement System did not contain an Emergency Clause; that it is essential to the proper administration of the Teacher Retirement System that the new provisions be given effect on July 1, 1973; that this Act is immediately necessary to amend Act 427 of 1973 to declare an emergency in order that said Act may be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 126, § 4: Feb. 8, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the services of a Board of Trustees that is representative of both active and retired teachers is essential to orderly and effective management of the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act, being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1983, No. 619, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1983, No. 665, § 14: July 1, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such correction and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to all other citizens of the state of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act, being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1983.”

Acts 1987, No. 4, § 6: July 1, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1987.”

Acts 1991, No. 43, § 11: July 1, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that certain provisions of the Teacher Retirement Law are badly in need of revision and updating to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy and that such revision and updating is of great importance to members of the Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1991.”

Acts 1995, No. 523, § 6: July 1, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that it is unnecessary for the Board of Trustees to have an ex officio member present to conduct business and that it will improve the operation of the Teacher Retirement System to make this change in the law. Therefore, in order to improve System operations, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 1995.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governer, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1997, No. 418, § 7: Mar. 10, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-First General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that various terms of the members and retirants trustees on the Teacher Retirement Board of Trustees need revision; that these differences in terms create an inequitable situation on the Board; that eliminating this inequity is essential to the administration of the retirement system; and it necessary to begin the terms of these members at prescribed times and this act should be given effect immediately. Therefore, in order to restore equity among the groups under the System's Board, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 555, § 17: Mar. 12, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the state needs to assure that the system is able to provide the best possible benefits, including safe, adequate, and affordable facilities, for the system's members and that several changes in, and clarification of, existing laws are immediately necessary in order for the system to continue to efficiently, effectively and timely administer the member's retirement benefits. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 866, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System law must be changed and refined periodically to clarify existing administrative practices within the system, that clarifying incorrect references and language in current law consumes a considerable amount of administrative time and effort, that the law needs to be clarified to reduce the cost and effort of responding to those inconsistencies, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the State's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 156, § 3: Feb. 8, 2001. The emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that membership on the Board of Trustees for the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System can change if members are not allowed to continue to serve after reaching the normal retirement age; that continuity and stability are important factors for the proper supervision of the retirement system; and that in order to retain valuable members on the board, it is necessary for this act to have immediate effect. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 385, § 10: July 1, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System law must be changed and refined periodically to clarify existing administrative practices within the system; that clarifying incorrect references and language in current law consumes a considerable amount of administrative time and effort; that the law needs to be clarified to reduce the cost and effort of responding to those inconsistencies; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2005.”

Acts 2007, No. 97, § 19: July 1, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the current laws applicable to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System require technical revisions; that revisions are necessary to ensure the effective and efficient operation of the system; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state’s fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2007.”

Acts 2009, No. 468, § 28:
July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are in dire need of technical correction to bring them into conformance with the current public pension policy; that such technical correction is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2011, No. 975, § 3: Apr. 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that when an unexpected vacancy occurs in a trustee position, the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System must be able to appoint a trustee until a special election is called; that trustees are called away from their regular job duties and responsibilities to attend system board meetings and should be encouraged to attend and accommodated in their attendance to fulfill their elected board functions; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2013, No. 109, § 2: Feb. 19, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to comply with complex federal tax laws and regulations the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System needs the authority to adopt rules, procedures, plans, programs, and actions necessary to enable the system to pay all benefits earned by the system's members; that the board should have broad authority whenever possible to resolve expeditiously an Internal Revenue System code limitation or restriction on payment of earned benefits of members and to lessen the financial burden on members of any unnecessary penalties or charges; and that this act is immediately necessary to take appropriate action to lessen any penalties or restrictions required by the Internal Revenue Service code while maintaining qualified plan status to protect members and their retirement. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2015, No. 301, § 11: Mar. 4, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the operations of a state public retirement system are complex and the system must be able to meet the needs of its members as anticipated by the General Assembly; that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are imminently in need of clarification to operate the system efficiently and effectively; that such clarification is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; and that this act is immediately necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 427, § 23: July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act, an act that created a state agency for the purpose of providing retirement benefits to school employees of the state, are in need of revision and updating to maintain the teacher retirement laws in conformance with sound public pension policy; that the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System operates on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that a July 1, 2019 effective date is necessary to allow the provisions of this act to begin on the first day of the fiscal year and to provide for the proper administration of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; that the updates and revisions to the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System Act are of great importance for actuarial purposes and the protection of member benefits under the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

24-7-301. Board of trustees — Members.

The general administration and responsibility for the proper operation of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and for making effective the provisions of this act are vested in a board of trustees of fifteen (15) persons as follows:

The Bank Commissioner, the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education shall be ex officio trustees;

Seven (7) members shall be elected active member trustees, each of whom shall have at least five (5) years of actual service in force and be an active member. For the purpose of this section and § 24-7-302, participants in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan shall be considered active members.

Four (4) active member trustees shall be employed in a position that requires state licensure, but not an administrator's license. One (1) member trustee will be elected from each of the four (4) congressional districts. The four (4) member trustees shall be elected by the members employed in positions that require state licensure, but not an administrator's license.

Two (2) active member trustees shall be employed in a position requiring an administrator's license, one (1) of whom shall be an administrator.

These two (2) active member trustees shall be elected by members employed in positions requiring an administrator's license.

One (1) active member trustee shall be employed in a position not requiring state licensure. This member trustee shall be elected by members employed in positions not requiring state licensure;

One (1) trustee shall be a minority, as defined under § 1-2-503, who:

Is an active or retired member of the system;

Is elected from the active and retired membership of the system; and

Has at least five (5) years of actual service;

Three (3) retirants shall be elected retirant trustees by the retirees of the system.

Each retirant trustee shall be a retirant with an annuity being paid by the system at the beginning of his or her term of office;

The member and retirant trustees shall be elected in accordance with rules as have been adopted by the board to govern the elections; and

An employee working for the system is not eligible to be:

Elected or appointed to the board; or

A candidate to be elected or appointed to the board.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 3; 1983, No. 126, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1438; Acts 1995, No. 523, § 1; 1997, No. 418, § 1; 1999, No. 866, § 1; 2007, No. 97, § 3; 2015, No. 301, § 2; 2019, No. 427, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment inserted “active” preceding the first occurrence of “member” in (2)(A) and throughout (2)(B) through (D); added “or an educational cooperative director” in the first sentence of (2)(C); added (3)(C) and redesignated former provisions of (3) as (3)(A) and (B); substituted “a minority, as defined under § 1-2-503” for “a person of a minority racial ethnic group” in the introductory language of (3); and added (6).

The 2019 amendment designated the two sentences in (2)(C) as (2)(C)(i) and (ii); substituted “shall be an administrator” for “must be a superintendent or an educational cooperative director” in (2)(C)(i); and substituted “an administrator's license” for “administrator licensure” in (2)(C)(ii).

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1973, No. 427, codified as §§ 24-7-201 — 24-7-205, 24-7-301 — 24-7-305, 24-7-401 — 24-7-411, 24-7-501, 24-7-502, 24-7-601 — 24-7-604, 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-713, 24-7-715, 24-7-716.

24-7-302. Term of office and vacancies.

The term of office of each member-elected trustee shall be six (6) years.

An active member trustee shall be ineligible to serve after becoming inactive, retiring, or ceasing to be employed by an Arkansas Teacher Retirement System employer.

A member trustee who participates in the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan is considered active for purposes of this subsection.

A retirant trustee is ineligible to serve after becoming active.

If any member trustee fails to attend three (3) consecutive regular meetings of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, unless in each case excused for cause by the remaining trustees attending the meetings, the member trustee shall be considered to have resigned from the board, and the board shall by resolution declare his or her office of trustee vacated.

A regular meeting of the board shall include one (1) or more days of official business to be considered by the board.

If a vacancy occurs in the office of an elected trustee, the board by majority vote may fill the vacancy by:

A special election; or

Appointment of a trustee until the next system election.

The board shall adopt its own rules pertaining to attendance and vacancies as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 3; 1983, No. 126, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1438; Acts 1991, No. 43, § 1; 1997, No. 418, § 2; 2001, No. 156, § 1; 2003, No. 196, § 1; 2009, No. 468, § 3; 2011, No. 975, § 1; 2015, No. 301, § 3.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1983, No. 126, § 2, provided, in part, that the term of office of each member trustee in office on July 1, 1983 should continue to the expiration of his term; the terms of the retirant trustees are arranged so that one term expires every year.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), substituted “member-elected trustee” for “member and retirant trustee elected after July 1, 1997” in (a)(1), inserted (a)(2)(A)(ii), and redesignated the remainder of (a)(2)(A) accordingly; subdivided and rewrote (b)(2); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment subdivided and rewrote (b)(2).

The 2015 amendment, in (a)(2)(A)(i), substituted “An active member” for “A member,” deleted “upon” preceding “retiring,” and added “or ceasing to be employed by an Arkansas Teacher Retirement System employer.”

24-7-303. Board of trustees — Officers — Committees.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall select from its own number a chair and a vice chair.

The trustees shall serve as trustees without compensation for their services as such, except that:

Each trustee may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.; and

The Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall reimburse a trustee for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties as trustee, including without limitation, the cost of:

A substitute teacher for a trustee; and

Communication services required for paperless board meetings.

Trustees are authorized to attend all system committee meetings, board meetings, and other official system functions without negative impact on his or her employment status.

The board shall appoint the Executive Director of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System, and he or she shall serve as its chief executive officer. He or she shall perform, or cause to be performed, such duties as are required of him or her under this act and as the board shall delegate to him or her.

The board shall appoint an actuary or a firm of actuaries to be technical advisor to the board on matters regarding the operation of the system on an actuarial basis. The actuary shall perform such duties as are required of him or her under this act and as are required of him or her by the board from time to time.

The board shall appoint a professional investment counsel to be investment advisor to the board.

No investment shall be made by the board until it has received the advice of its investment advisor.

However, if the contemplated investment involves anything other than financial assets, as defined in § 4-8-102(a)(9), then in lieu of seeking advice from its investment advisor, the board shall seek and receive advice from a person having recognized expertise with respect to the type of investment contemplated.

The board shall appoint a medical committee consisting of three (3) physicians to review applications for disability retirement.

The executive director may employ such other professional and clerical services and purchase such equipment and supplies as are required for the proper operation of the system, subject to the approval of the board.

The compensation of the persons engaged by the board shall be consistent with the pay plan of the state.

All other expenses of the board necessary for the operation of the system shall be paid at such rates and in such amounts as the board shall approve.

The board may create additional committees as necessary and appropriate to fulfill the duties and responsibilities of the board under this chapter.

An audit committee created by the board shall perform an annual employee evaluation of an internal auditor of the system.

The audit committee may:

Meet in executive session, with or without the internal auditor, for the purpose of conducting, reviewing, and discussing the employee evaluation of the internal auditor; and

Gather information necessary to conduct a fair review of the internal auditor.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1438; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 231; 1999, No. 555, § 12; 2009, No. 468, § 4; 2011, No. 975, § 2; 2017, No. 127, § 1.

Publisher's Notes.

The reimbursement provision in subsection (b) of this section may be affected by § 25-16-802 concerning mileage reimbursement for members of state boards and commissions.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment subdivided (e); inserted “to review applications for disability retirement” in (f); inserted (h)(2)(B) and redesignated the remainder of (h)(2) accordingly; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment subdivided former (b); and inserted (b)(1)(B) and (b)(2).

The 2017 amendment added (i).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-7-301.

24-7-304. Meetings.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall hold regular meetings at least quarterly.

Eight (8) trustees constitute a quorum at any meeting of the board.

Each trustee shall be entitled to one (1) vote on each question before the board, and at least eight (8) concurring votes shall be required for a decision by the board at any meeting.

The board shall adopt its own rules of procedure and shall keep a record of its proceedings.

All meetings of the board shall be public.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1438; Acts 1987, No. 4, § 1; 1995, No. 523, § 2; 1997, No. 418, § 3.

24-7-305. Board of trustees — Duties and responsibilities.

Both the contributory plan provided by this act and the noncontributory plan established by §§ 24-7-401 — 24-7-411 and 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-713, 24-7-715, and 24-7-716 [repealed] shall be under the administration and control of the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System as provided by § 24-7-301.

It is the intent of the General Assembly that neither the composition, responsibilities, nor the authority of the board be changed as a result of §§ 24-7-401 — 24-7-411 and 24-7-701, 24-7-702, 24-7-704 — 24-7-713, 24-7-715, and 24-7-716 [repealed].

The board shall promulgate rules as it deems necessary from time to time in the transaction of its business and in administering the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

In order to fully comply with federal requirements that may affect the members or the members' benefits under this subchapter, and to limit the impact of changes in federal requirements on members or the members' benefits, the board may promulgate rules to:

Establish the regular retirement age for members consistent with the provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 411;

Maintain the system's retirement plan tax qualification status by the United States Government to remain tax-exempt and tax-qualified under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 401(a); and

Modify or eliminate a plan provision that was originally established to comply with Internal Revenue Code requirements but is no longer necessary to maintain the plan's tax-qualified status under the Internal Revenue Code, 26 U.S.C. § 1 et seq., including without limitation provisions concerning:

Penalties;

Restrictions;

Time limitations; and

Other requirements that impact a member, members' benefits, or the plan.

The board may adopt rules, procedures, plans, programs, and actions necessary to enable the system to pay all benefits earned by the system's members and reduce penalties or restrictions required by the Internal Revenue Service while maintaining compliance with the Internal Revenue Service.

The board may adopt or amend by motion or resolution at any board meeting investment policies, investment procedures, and investment asset allocation targets that are consistent with the board's fiduciary obligations under the prudent investor rule and other obligations under this subchapter.

The board may set or amend by a motion or resolution at any board meeting a de minimis amount of twenty-five dollars ($25.00) or less concerning the system's obligation to distribute or collect payments, penalties, interest, funds, or moneys.

The rulemaking authority specifically granted under this chapter shall not limit the general rulemaking authority of the board under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.

The board shall adopt from time to time such reasonable mortality and other tables of experience and a rate or rates of regular interest as shall be necessary for the actuarial requirements of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The Executive Director of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall keep, or cause to be kept, in convenient form such data as shall be necessary for actuarial investigations of the experiences of the system, and such data as shall be necessary for annual actuarial valuations of the system.

The board shall annually render a report to each employer showing the financial condition of the system as of the preceding June 30.

The report shall contain, but shall not be limited to:

A financial balance sheet;

A statement of income and disbursements;

A detailed statement of investments acquired and disposed of during the year, together with a detailed statement of the annual rates of investment income from all assets and from each type of investment;

An actuarial balance sheet prepared by means of the last valuation of the system; and

Such other data as the board shall deem necessary to comply with § 24-2-702.

In addition to the distribution of the report provided by this subsection, it shall also be distributed to the Legislative Council and to the Governor.

All records of the system shall be kept and maintained in the office of the system.

The board shall arrange for adequate surety bonds covering the executive director and any other custodian of the funds or investments of the board.

When approved by the board, the bonds shall be deposited in the office of the Treasurer of State.

The records and accounts of the system shall be audited by Arkansas Legislative Audit.

The headquarters of the system shall be in Little Rock.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 427, § 3; 1983, No. 619, § 2; 1983, No. 665, § 2; 1985, No. 504, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 80-1438; Acts 1993, No. 403, § 18; 2005, No. 385, § 1; 2007, No. 97, § 4; 2009, No. 745, § 2; 2013, No. 109, § 1; 2015, No. 301, §§ 4, 5; 2015, No. 1165, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The operation of subsection (g) of this section was suspended by adoption of a self-insured fidelity bond program for public officers, officials and employees, effective July 20, 1987, pursuant to § 21-2-701 et seq. The subsection may again become effective upon cessation of coverage under that program. See § 21-2-703.

Pursuant to Acts 2015, No. 1165, §
10, subsection (b) is set out above as amended by Acts 2015, No. 301, § 4. Subsection (b) was also amended by Acts 2015, No. 1165, § 1, to read as follows:

“(b)(1)

The board shall promulgate rules as it considers necessary from time to time in the transaction of its business and in administering the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

“(2)

In order to fully comply with federal requirements that may affect the members or the members' benefits under this subchapter and to limit the impact of changes in federal requirements on members or the members' benefits, the board may promulgate rules to:

“(A)

Establish the regular retirement age for members consistent with Section 411 of the Internal Revenue Code;

“(B)

Maintain the system's retirement plan tax qualification status by the federal government to remain tax exempt and tax qualified under Section 401(a) of the Internal Revenue Code; and

“(C)

Modify or eliminate a plan provision that was originally established to comply with Internal Revenue Code requirements but is no longer necessary to maintain the plan's tax-qualified status under the Internal Revenue Code, including without limitation provisions concerning:

“(i)

Penalties;

“(ii)

Restrictions;

“(iii)

Time limitations; and

“(iv)

Other requirements that impact a member, members' benefits, or the plan.

“(3)

The board may adopt rules, procedures, plans, programs, and actions necessary to enable the system to pay all benefits earned by the system's members and reduce penalties or restrictions required by the Internal Revenue Service while maintaining compliance with the Internal Revenue Service.”

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted (b)(2) and redesignated the remaining text of (b) accordingly.

The 2013 amendment inserted “and to limit the impact of changes in federal requirements on members or the members' benefits” in (b)(2); and added (b)(2)(C) and (b)(2)(D).

The 2015 amendment by No. 301 added (b)(3) through (5) [now (b)(4) through (6)]; and deleted “not later than April 1 of each year” following “annually” in (e)(1).

The 2015 amendment by No. 1165 substituted “considers” for “deems” in (b)(1); substituted “Section 411” for “the provisions of section 411” in (b)(2)(A); substituted “Section” for “section” in (b)(2)(B); and redesignated former (b)(2)(D) as (b)(3).

Meaning of “this act”.

See note to § 24-7-301.